Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-942
University of Nebraska; mission; priorities.

It is recognized that as the state's land grant institution the University of Nebraska is engaged in instruction, research, and public service, and that these three parts of the university's mission are interdependent. However, when viewed in its entirety, the university's first priority shall be undergraduate instruction, the university's second priority shall be graduate and professional instruction and research, and the university's third priority shall be public service.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 26.